test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonynaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonynaanbaniig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonsnaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonsnaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonsnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonynaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonynaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonynaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonywaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonywaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonywaabniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsnaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsnaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonswaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonswaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonswaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonywaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonywaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonyniwbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonyniwbaniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonswaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonswaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsniwbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkmishnaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkmishnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkmishnaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkmishnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkmishwaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkmishwaadig
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: jooweshkmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: njooweshkmishnaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkmishnaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkmishnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkmishnaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkmishnaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkmishnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkmishwaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkmishwaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkmishwaag
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: jooweshkmishwaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkmishwaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: jooweshkmishniwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: jooweshkmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: njooweshkmishbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: njooweshkmishbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: njooweshkmishbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gjooweshkmishbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkmishbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkmishbaniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkmishbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmishbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkmishbaniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmishbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkminaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkminaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkminaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkminaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkminaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkminaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkmiwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkmiwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkmiwaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkmiwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmiwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkminwibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkshinaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkshinaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkshinaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkshinaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkshinaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkshinaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkshiwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkshiwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkshiwaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkshiwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkshiwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkshinwibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkshinwibniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkoonymishnaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonymishnaandig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkoonsmishnaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonsmishnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonymishnaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonymishwaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishwaadig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonsmishnaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonsmishwaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishwaadig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: jooweshkoonymishniwba
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: jooweshkoonsmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: njooweshkoonymishnaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkoonymishnaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkoonymishnaanig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: njooweshkoonsmishnaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkoonsmishnaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkoonsmishnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonymishnaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonymishnaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonymishwaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonymishwaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishwaag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonsmishnaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonsmishnaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonsmishwaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonsmishwaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishwaag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: jooweshkoonymishwaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkoonymishwaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: jooweshkoonymishniwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: jooweshkoonymishniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: jooweshkoonsmishwaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkoonsmishwaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: jooweshkoonsmishniwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: jooweshkoonsmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: njooweshkoonymishbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonymishbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonymishbaniig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: njooweshkoonsmishbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonsmishbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonsmishbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonymishbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonymishbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsmishbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsmishbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishbaniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkoonymishbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonymishbaniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsmishbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsmishbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkoonymishbaniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonymishbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonymishbaniig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsmishbaniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsmishbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonsmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonyminaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonyminaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonyminaanbaniig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonsminaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonsminaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonsminaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonyminaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonyminaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonyminaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonymiwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonymiwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonymiwaabniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsminaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsminaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsminaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsmiwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsmiwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmiwaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonymiwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonymiwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonyminwibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonyminwibniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsmiwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsmiwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsminwibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonyshinaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonyshinaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonyshinaanbaniig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonsshinaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonsshinaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonsshinaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonyshinaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonyshinaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonyshinaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonyshiwaabniin
